District of Columbia statutes.
32-101

Covered employees.

(a)

This chapter shall apply to the following employees, except persons employed less than 15 hours per week and except persons employed in an executive, administrative, or professional capacity as defined by the Secretary of Labor under § 13(a)(1) of the Fair Labor Standards Act (29 U.S.C. § 213(a)(1)) or required by District of Columbia law in effect on April 26, 1994, to possess an occupational license:

(1)

Employees hired by a contractor as food service workers in a hotel, restaurant, cafeteria, apartment building, hospital, nursing care facility, or similar establishment;

(2)

Employees hired by a contractor to perform janitorial or building maintenance services in an office building, institution, or similar establishment;

(3)

Nonprofessional employees hired by a contractor to perform health care or related support services in a hospital, nursing care facility, or similar establishment; and

(4)

Employees hired by a contractor to perform security services in an office building, institution, or similar establishment; provided, that special police officers who are armed, and employees hired by a contractor to perform security services for the Board of Education or a public charter school shall not be included.

(b)

For the purposes of this chapter “contractor” includes a subcontractor and means an individual or company that employs 25 or more persons.

Apr. 26, 1994, D.C. Law 10-105, § 2, 41 DCR 1011
June 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-118, § 402, 53 DCR 2602
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 114, 56 DCR 1117

History

1981 Ed., § 36-1501.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 16-118 added par. (a)(4).
D.C. Law 17-353 validated a previously made technical correction in the punctuation in subsecs. (a)(1), (2), and (3).

Effect of Amendments

Mayor authorized to issue rules: Section 5 of D.C. Law 10-105 provided that the Mayor shall promulgate rules to implement this chapter.

Editor's Notes